Massachusetts, session 194th, S2218.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 2 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following section:- 
Section 61. The song, “Roadrunner”, words and music by Jonathan Richman, as recorded 
by Jonathan Richman and The Modern Lovers shall be the official rock song of the 
commonwealth.